Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB108.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5703(b)(2) of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subparagraphs to read:§ 5703. License required.* * *(b) Exempt retail food facilities.--* * *(2) A licensor shall exempt the following retail food facilities from the license requirements of this section:* * *(iv) A retail food facility owned by a charitable nonprofit entity that operates on no more than 12 days each calendar year.123456789101112131415161718 (v) A retail food facility under paragraph (1)(vii) that operates on no more than 12 days each calendar year.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0108PN0061 - 2 - 1234